Florida, session 2026, SB734.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âPresent subsection (17) of section 163.514, 13 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (18), and a new 14 subsection (17) is added to that section, to read: 15 163.514âPowers of neighborhood improvement districts. 16 Unless prohibited by ordinance, the board of any district shall 17 be empowered to: 18 (17)âPlan, finance, or complete structural safety or 19 building compliance improvements, including improvements 20 required under state or local structural recertification 21 programs, if such improvements are approved by: 22 (a)âA majority vote of the districtâs residents; or 23 (b)âAn advisory council composed of residents of the 24 district, if such a council has been established by local 25 ordinance pursuant to s. 163.506. 26 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.